Hawaii, session 2026, SB3140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. Section 132-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) The budgetary requirements for conducting meetings and other related functions of the state fire council, including the salaries of the administrator and administrative assistant, shall be included in the budget of the [department of labor and industrial relations.] department of law enforcement." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST